Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Administration of Oaths

§ 5851.
Affirmation.

In the administration of an oath, the word “swear” may be omitted, and the word “affirm” substituted, when the person to whom the obligation is administered is religiously scrupulous of swearing, or taking an oath in the prescribed form; and, in such case, the words “so help you God” may be omitted, and the words “under the pains and penalties of perjury” substituted; and a person so affirming shall be considered, for every legal purpose of privilege, qualification, or liability, as having been duly sworn.

§ 5852.
Oaths of office; by whom administered.

When other provision is not made by law, oaths of office may be administered by any Justice of the Supreme Court, Superior judge, assistant judge, justice of the peace, notary public, or the presiding officer, secretary, or clerk of either house of the General Assembly, or by the Governor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 169, eff. March 29, 1972;

1991, No. 22

;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 88.

§ 5853.
By clerks of courts, referees, etc.

Clerks and registers of courts, committees of the General Assembly, and referees, auditors, commissioners, special masters, and committees appointed by a court of law may administer oaths necessary to be taken for the establishment of truth or the furtherance of justice in any matter coming before such court, board, or commission for investigation.

§ 5854.
Oaths, administering by court clerks, justices, notaries, etc.; certification.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court, county clerks, justices of the peace, judges and registers of probate, judges and clerks of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, notaries public and masters appointed by a Superior Court under an order of referee may administer oaths in all cases where an oath is required, unless a different provision is expressly made by law; and a notary public need not affix his or her official seal to a certificate of an oath administered by him or her. County clerks and clerks of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court may certify the oaths administered by them under the seal of the court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 170, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 5855.
Oaths and acknowledgments by members of the U.S. Armed Forces.

Whenever an oath of office, oath to an affidavit, deposition, or other written instrument or an acknowledgment of a deed, lease, conveyance, release, or other written instrument is required for use in or in connection with any matter pending in this State, such oaths may be taken before any officer of the U.S. Armed Forces of the rank of captain or rank superior thereto of the Army or equivalent rank in the other branches of service or by a person authorized by law where such oath or acknowledgment is to be taken to administer oaths and the officer or person who administers such oath or takes such acknowledgment shall state such fact thereunder over his or her signature and rank or title.

§ 5856.
Storage of judicial oaths.

The Vermont Supreme Court shall adopt a rule which establishes a procedure for the storage of judicial oaths.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.